Utah statutes.
53A-17a-152.    Grades four through six mathematics improvement.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Board" means the State Board of Education.
(b)  "Title I school" means a school receiving federal monies under Title I of
the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, Pub. L. No 107-110, for a schoolwide or
targeted assistance program.
(2)  The board shall issue a request for proposals from school districts and
charter schools to improve mathematics achievement test scores of students in
grades four through six.
(3)  Each proposal shall use professional development, incentive bonuses, or a
combination of professional development and incentive bonuses as a strategy to
improve mathematics achievement test scores of students in grades four through
six.
(4)  The board shall select proposals for funding based on the criteria stated
in the request for proposals with priority given to Title I schools.
(5) (a)  There is appropriated for fiscal year 2006-07 only, $7,500,000 from
the Uniform School Fund to the board to fund the implementation of proposals
to improve mathematics achievement test scores of students in grades four
through six as provided in this section.
(b)  The board may provide funding to implement a proposal for up to three
years.
(c)  At least 50% of the money budgeted to implement proposals under this
section shall be budgeted to implement incentive bonus plans.
(d)  The money appropriated in Subsection (5)(a) shall be nonlapsing.
(6)  The board shall make a report to the Education Interim Committee after
each year of proposal implementation.  The report shall provide an analysis of
how professional development and incentive bonus plans impact mathematics
achievement test scores in grades four through six.
